Hawaii statutes.
[§132D-18] Effect on other laws.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to the possession, storage,
sale, or use of explosives and combustibles in accordance with chapter 396. [L
1994, c 180, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next